Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-102 Capital funds. Capital
funds means the excess of the assets of an insurer over its liabilities.
Capital stock, if any, shall not be deemed to be a liability for the purposes
of this section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next